District of Columbia statutes.
7-2202

Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency; Director and other personnel; compensation.

(a)

To carry out the purposes of this chapter, the Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to establish in the municipal government of such District a Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency to consist of a Director and such other personnel as may be needed. Such Director shall be the executive head of such Office.

(b)

Notwithstanding the limitation of any law, there may be employed in such Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency any person who has been retired from any of the uniformed services of the United States or any office or position in the federal or District governments, and except as hereinafter provided, while so employed in such Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency any such retired person may receive the compensation authorized for such employment or the retirement compensation or annuity, whichever he may elect, and upon the termination of such employment, he shall be restored to the same status as a retired officer or employee with the same retirement compensation or annuity to which he was entitled before having been employed in such Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency. While any person who has been retired from any of the uniformed services of the United States is so employed in such Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency, he may receive the compensation authorized for such employment and his retired or retirement pay, subject to § 5532 [repealed] of Title 5, United States Code.

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 438, ch. 686, § 2
Aug. 19, 1964, 87 Stat. 489, Pub. L. 88-448, title IV, § 401(b)
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 101(b), 54 DCR 794
1981 Ed., § 6-1402.
1973 Ed., § 6-1202.
D.C. Law 16-262, in subsecs. (a) and (b), substituted “Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency” for “Office of Emergency Preparedness”.
Pursuant to Mayor’s Order 98-198 ( 46 DCR 240) pub. January 8, 1999, the name of the Office of Emergency Preparedness has been changed to the D.C. Emergency Management Agency.
Office of Civil Defense abolished: The Office of Civil Defense was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. Reorganization Order No. 45 of the Board of Commissioners, dated June 26, 1953, and as amended October 22, 1953, established under the Board of Commissioners, a Citizens’ Civil Defense Advisory Council to advise and consult with the Board and the Director of Civil Defense on matters of basic civil defense policies. The Order describes the purposes and functions of the new Council, and abolished the previous Civil Defense Advisory CounciL. Reorganization Order No. 49, as amended November 10, 1953, established under the supervision and control of a Commissioner, an Office of Civil Defense headed by a Director. The Order set forth the purpose, organization, and functions of the new Office of Civil Defense. The previous Office of Civil Defense was abolished and its functions and positions together with all personnel, property, records, and unexpended funds relating to those functions and positions were transferred to the new Office of Civil Defense. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Reorganization Order No. 49 was rescinded by Commissioner’s Order No. 71-259, dated July 26, 1971, which established a new Office of Civil Defense. Organization Order No. 51 of the Commissioner of the District of Columbia, dated December 27, 1974, established in the Executive Office of the Commissioner, a new Office of Civil Defense, headed by a Director, and prescribed the purposes and functions thereof. The Order replaced and rescinded Commissioner’s Order No. 71-259, dated July 26, 1971, as amended by Commissioner’s Order No. 73-156, July 5, 1973. The name of the Office of Civil Defense was changed to the Office of Emergency Preparedness by Mayor’s Order No. 76-49, dated January 23, 1976.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Government Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor and the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.